To see the salad it takes a hair for vinegar, one right for salt and a strange for oil.
Ferme will know who won.
Brigant and a half brigand.
In good Cavalier does not miss launches.
Good horse is missing saddle.
In a good horse you don't need to trotta.
Good advice is not found price.
Few words to the wise.
Hot autumn follows long winter.
A burned dog the cold cold water.
A dog old don't give him kennel.
At carnival every joke applies, but that is a joke that knows about salt.
Anything goes at carnival time.
At home of armchairs it is always a party.
At the house of the players do not go to Serenate.
At his house everyone is king.
A bad worker every gear from pain.
At Caval that runs, don't despise spurs.
Cavalo Donato doesn't look in her mouth.
New old knight caval.
At Cavalier Novice, Horse without a vice.
On horseback others do not say lame.
On horseback of fire, straw man, to straw man, fire horse.
Street horse, old cavalier.
To whom he beats strong, the doors are opened.
To those who want to help, nothing can harm.
To those fortune Zufola, he has a nice dancing.
To those who have enough, nothing is missing.
The armor is not enough to those who are afraid.
To those who always eat polenta chickens.
Who doesn't like wine, the Lord does water.
To those who cannot learn the board, the Bible cannot be given.
To those who do not fear the sermon really the stick.
To those who do not want to believe all the tests are useless.
To those who do not want to believe, little worth a thousand witnesses.
To those who do not want to make struggles, the land produces nettles.
Those who take a wife takes two brains.
To those who are so much and to those who are nothing.
Who took you a finger not take your hand.
To those who are too much and who nothing.
To those who want to rest it better.
To those who want to hurt the opportunity.
It is enough for each day.
Each is your own suit.
At Combat with the mud, who wins or lose, always breaks us.
To a woman of great beauty, from the lack of width.
Hard strain, it accepts.
To shave you are fine one day, to take a wife you are good a month, to kill the pig is fine one year.
Drop drip the stone fell.
Drop to drop the sea is done.
Drop drip the stone digs.
At great climb, great downhill.
In Granello, the Staio is filled and the mountain is done.
Fat neighboring poverty kitchen.
At heir's tears he is crazy who believes us.
In Lavar the head to asino put the ran back and soap.
In Lavar the donkey's head is lost the rain and soap.
On the lumen off is every beauty.
Desperate times call for desperate measures.
Low wall each leans each other.
At Christmas with yours, at Easter with whoever you want.
At Christmas on the balcony, at Easter with a guise.
To enemy that escaped gold bridges.
His party to every saint.
At each bird his nest is beautiful.
A Father Avaro Figliuol prodigo.
To pay and die there always time.
Comparison of the much we ignore, it is less than nothing as we know.
A crazy speaker, Savio listener.
There is always time to think.
To think badly there is a hurt.
To think badly, it always takes you.
A pot that bubbles, cat does not get up.
In Rubar little go to jail, to Rubar so much career.
In San Lorenzo the tooth the walnut already feels.
In San Martino Novembre, open the barrel and taste the wine.
In San Martino every must is a wine.
In San Mattia the snow goes away.
To joke with the flame, you burn.
To this fortress, this trench.
At the table and at the table the farmer is judged.
At the table you don't get old.
Acrow is the tin of the sea who twice wants to come back.
To all there is a remedy except for death.
A new custom does not run.
On flights too high and sudden the precipices are close to be near.
Abbot Cupid, for an offer for a hundred.
Rigorous abbot makes the friars penitent.
The shadow disappeared.
Abundance generates baldness.
Foreign clothes, foreign costumes; foreign costumes, foreign people; Foreign people disloggia the ancient inhabitants.
I'm too brought and woman too sighted soon to boredom.
It happens in an hour what does not take place in a hundred years.
It happens in an hour what does not happen in the years.
The son happened whenever you want, and the daughter when you can.
Turn on a candle to the saints and one to the devil.
Turn on a torch to light in the sun.
Water running does not wear poison.
Water Cheta breaks the bridges.
Water of San Lorenzo August coming in time; If the Madonna is still good; Late always good when it arrives.
Water and chat do not make pancakes.
Distant water does not turn off the fire.
Passed water no more.
Buy good fame and put yourself to sleep.
Old tree and a falling wall, it never fails ivy.
At each spring follows an autumn.
Everyone his cross.
Everyone seems beautiful his.
At a fat noon often tien behind a lean dinner.
To lovers and hunters for a pleasure pain pains.
August mature the wheat and must.
August: My wife I don't know you.
At liars and spacons is not believed.
To the most bovi than calves van slaughterhouses.
To crazy and children, nothing must be promised.
The crazy is always right.
To flights too high and sudden the precipices are flying to be close.
Help yours and others if you can.
Helped God tiute her.
Help that the Ciel t'aiuta.
Help you help you.
At kissing you soon tien behind the bed.
The friend is known to the need.
In the dark the Villana is as beautiful as the checker.
In the dark all the cats are Bigi.
In the dark, women are all the same.
At the ... or do not be commanded.
At Confessor, Doctor and Lawyer, do not hold the CELATO.
At the confessor, the doctor and the lawyer is not held the concealed.
At the Contadin, don't let know how good cheese is with pears.
At the heart you don't command.
The heart is not commanded.
At destiny is not commanded.
To his brother he likes to see his rich sister, than to do so.
At the cat licking the skewer don't affect roast.
The wings are not given to the genius, but they cut them.
At the Levar the curtains you know the gain.
To the doctor, the confessor and the lawyer, every sin must be said.
The nose is not made a case.
The bread is missing to the poor, to the rich appetite.
To the poor do so many things are missing, to the farewell.
The tree does not fall at the first shot.
A tree does not fall at the first shot.
The pignata is recognized at the sound.
At the time and the CXXO is not commanded.
At the time it is not commanded.
The old man never fails to tell.
At the village if he gives him a finger he takes his whole hand.
At the village, if he gives him his finger, he takes his hand.
At the Tien behind the B in our skilled.
The echo is the last word.
At the ORARA Paion beautiful his teddy bears.
At the gizzle cracking crack.
The sheep counts in the last.
Humility happiness, to pride calamity.
At Candelo from winter semo hole.
Hunning is soon reduced to those who cancel without biscuit.
Eventually the spit pearls come to boredom.
At the end he praises his life and at night the day.
In the end I praise life and in the evening praise the day.
To the war it is full of denari and returns full of vices and lice.
At the crazy barbs, the barber learns to raze.
Sometimes it is believed to find the August sun and is the March moon.
Other times, other costumes.
Get up early in the morning if you want to be giving your neighbor.
Amar the neighbor is a great advantage, you often see and you don't travel.
Loving and not being loved is lost time.
Do not shoot the messenger.
Ambassador who laards good news that leads.
Friendship that ceases, was never true.
Amico Benefxxato, stated enemy.
Good time mutasis with the wind.
Amico di Ventura, a lot of briga and little hard.
Among it is a pleasure that costs expensive.
Amor who is born of disease, when he heals passes away.
Life of our last deception.
New amor goes and comes, old love keeps it.
AMOR holds its reign without sword.
Amor without baruffa makes mold.
Amor, spite, anger and jealousy, on the heart of the woman Han Signoria.
Love with Amor you pay.
Brother love, knife love.
Love of parentato, interested love.
Very nice holiday love and little last.
Love is the real price with you buy love.
Love you don't buy or sell it.
Honored love nor shame nor sin.
Love leans love.
Roses are also born among the spines.
Beachers also become men.
Even the greenest becomes hay.
Even the sun has its stains.
Even the abbot was first friar.
Also ambition is a hunger.
Even the crooked wood gives straight fire.
Even the Queen Margherita eats chicken with fingers.
Even the beasts made the Lord.
Even the doves have the gall.
Even the fleas have a cough.
Even the eggs of the black hen are white; But we'll see if her chicks are white.
Even a golden yoke weighs.
Andar Beast, and Tornar Beast, says the Moro.
Andar will soon sleep and get up early closes the door to many diseases.
Snowy year fruitful year.
New Year New Life.
Take advantage of the errors of others, rather than censors them.
APRIL sweet sleep.
April and May are the key to the year.
April every drop a barrel.
Rainy April, Wind Windy, Fruttuoso.
Ara in the sea and in the Rhena sowing, those who believe in the words of the female.
Rainbow brings the serene.
Important air, ignorance diploma.
Red air or piss or blowing.
Donkey who is hungry eats every layer.
Old donkey does not take lessons.
Very good dance to those fortune plays.
I ask those who are well served and tax.
Very question who complains.
French assault and Spanish retreat.
Attach the donkey where he wants the master and, if he breaks his neck, his damage.
Having grace, gabbed the Holy.
Bacchus, tobacco and Venus reducer the man in ashes.
Kiss of mouth often cuor does not touch.
We will dance according to you will play.
Broken flag of Captain.
Old Flag of Captain Onord.
Just a crazy home.
Beat the iron until it's hot.
Beat the iron when it's hot.
Beautiful cats and big lethamai show the good farmer.
Bel'ostessa, dear account.
Beautiful thing soon is kidnapped.
Beautiful in sight, inside is tried.
Beautiful ostessa, ugly accounts.
Beautiful ostessa, traitorized accounts.
Beautiful vineyard little grapes.
Body beauty is not inheritance.
Beauty and madness often go together.
Handsome in ugly bands in the square.
Well he knows the barrel of which wine is full.
Ben hunt the devil, but Satan returns.
Well educated, never lied.
Good for evil is charity, badly for good is cruelty.
Lost well is known.
Goods of fortune pass like the moon.
Drink the wine and let the water go to the mill.
Bread and wine to wine must be said.
You have to make a good face to bad game.
Virtue needs must be done.
You have to make bread with the flour you have.
We need to be a party when it falls, and take the time as it comes.
We need to be a party when the saint is.
You have to eat to live and not live to eat.
You have to take events when God sends them.
Mouth that tax can help.
Mouth that teas no one helps you.
Closed mouth and open eye never did badly.
Good barrel makes good wine.
Bad what is the poor superb and the rich arm.
Ugly face ha under paradise.
Ugly in beautiful bands in the square.
Hole the marble for a drop of water.
Bue flask Printing the foot on the ground stronger.
Bue loose lick for everything.
Old ox, straight groove.
Good fire and good wine, warm my fireplace.
Good blood doesn't mind.
Good time and bad weather does not last all the time.
Good wine and skill, little last.
Good wine makes good blood.
Good wine, long fairytale.
Good fame soon is lost.
Good crib, good beast.
Good guard uses to many things.
Good strength, better ingenuity.
Good words and pears don't break your head to anyone.
Burlando is the real.
Cader can not, those who have a driving virtue.
Players change but music is always that.
Change and improve are two things; Much is changed to the world, but little improves.
Campa horse that grass grows.
Campa, my horse, that the grass grows.
Campar without effort is a very ancient desire.
Can barking does not bite.
Hungry dog does not fear stick.
Three dog and cat nore and three nursive.
Dog does not eat dog.
Hanging and not forced dog, woe to his skin!
Long hair, short brain.
Card sings and Villan sleeps.
Card sings and villano sleeps.
Casa made and vineyard mail, you don't know what it costs.
My house, my house, although small you are, you look like a bado.
My house, my house, for a child that you are, you look like a bado.
My house, my house, although you are looking for me a bady.
Punishes the voucher and will emphasize himself; Bright the villain and gets worse.
Bad stick doesn't make good dog.
Bad began, end worst.
Car horse, little coast and little hard.
Old horse, late vouchers.
Heated cabbage was never good.
Heated cabbage, fragrant friar and serva returned never good.
One hundred heads, hundred hats.
Certain stains can be scratched but don't remove.
Ceased the gain, ceased friendship.
Whoever easily believes, deceived you see.
Whoever does not have it, to thirty does not do it, in forty loses what little he has.
Who caresses the mula will busy kicks.
Who caresses the mula remedies kicks.
Who accepts the inheritance also accept debts.
Who to other deceptions weaves, little well for himself sorts.
Those who take care takes a blind by guide.
Whoever raises the foot for every straw, can easily break one leg.
Who loves good luck.
Those who love me loves my dog.
Who a perky wet land, for three years has dissipated it.
Those who listen to too many people conclude little or nothing.
Who donkey was born, donkey dies.
Those who dance without sound, as ass meet.
Whoever cultivates the Moro, cultivated a great treasure in his field.
Whoever begins is halfway.
Whoever begins is half of the work.
Whoever begins is halfway.
Who sows well, well collects.
Whoever drinks a hundred years camp beer.
Who drinks Vin, camp hundred years.
Who blames his neighbor who died, say the truth, say the fake, he always wrong.
Those who will gladly find the hare soon.
Who falls into poverty, loses every friend.
Who understands, suffer.
Whoever gives and does not put the possessions delay.
Who rides or trotting to the china, or is not his beast, or not the esteem.
Chi hundred makes us expect.
Those who try to know what bubbles in the pot of others, lick its own.
Who seeks loyalty and loyalty in the world, does not find hypocrisy.
Who seeks Find and those who question intends.
Who seeks, finds.
Who caught unripe the hindsight, mature has always ignoring the fruit.
Those who start high, ends down.
Who buys superfluous, prepares to sell the necessary.
Who buys especially and those who bought appreciate.
Those against God throws the stone, in his head.
Who in summer dry Serpi, in winter eats eels.
Who in summer wants to be cool, will stay there even in winter.
Whoever gives a lot of credit loses friends and Danar has never.
Those from the Gallina was born, conven that Razzoli.
Who gives acorns cannot restore confetti.
Who gives to receive, does nothing.
About Savio operate wants, you think in the end.
Who from the lot hopes for rescue, puts the hair like a bear.
Who of wine is a friend, of himself is enemy.
Who cables ferra, of coltel perishes.
Who of Gallina was born that Razzoli.
Who wounds swords perishes.
Who of hope campa, desperate dies.
Those of hope experienced desperate dies.
Who of spirit and talent is full dominates on those who have less.
Who of a bad woman gets injured, happy with it ages and loves it again.
Whoever gives himself of his feeling too much trust.
Those who say to arrivals up to Z.
Those who say to must say also B.
Who says woman says they give.
Who says woman says trouble, who says man worse than ever.
Who says woman, says damage.
Whoever says badly, guesses almost always.
Who says what he wants he hears what he wouldn't want to.
Whoever despises buy.
Those who despise want to buy and those who praise want to leave.
Whoever despises, buy.
Anyone who asks what should not, hear what he wouldn't want to.
Whoever does not err.
Those who question makes mistakes.
Whoever asks does not make mistakes.
Who after the polenta drinks water, raises the leg and polenta escapes.
Who sleeps in August sleep at its cost.
Who sleeps does not catch fish.
Who is a liar is a thief.
Who causes its mal, cry itself.
Who is destined for the gallows does not drown.
Who is generous with your mouth, is sacked.
Who is in default is in suspicion.
Who is sent by the Pharisees is deceived by the Pharisees.
Whoever bites from the Serpe, fears the lizard.
Those who are born citrullo is for others a transpoll.
Who is a slave of ambitions has a thousand masters.
Who was found once in fraud, it is always assumed.
Whoever is quick to eat is quick to work.
Who is rooted by a usurer, does not put more fur.
Who is used to lay, does not fear the fork.
Those who are doing for three.
Who does good for the ungrateful, God considers it for evil.
Who does falary and those who don't make flicker.
Anyone who hives the light.
Those who are fast ago twice.
Who does the other of course craft, makes the soup in the basket.
Who does the law, must keep it.
Who makes the beans without fertilizer collects them without pods.
Who makes an injustice, forget it; Who receives it, remembers it.
Who makes a law, must also care that it is executed.
Whoever lives, would be rich.
Those who flee judgment, condemns.
Those who flee a crazy, made a good day.
Who throws a seed must cultivate it if it wants to see it with time to sprout.
Those who play at the lot is a great merlotto.
Those who play the lot, in ruin goes out of bang.
Those who play the lot, in ruin goes of trot.
Whoever had had and those who gave it ..
Who had the benefit, if you forget it.
Those who have to do with an inconstant, tien the eel for the tail.
Those who have teeth has no bread and who has bread has no teeth.
Who has flour does not have a bag.
Anyone who made injury to others, from other convenes that supports it.
Whoever has the head of wax, does not go to the sun.
Those who embarked the devil must be in his company.
Who has ingenuity, monsters.
Who has for bed the earth, must cover itself with the sky.
Whoever has faster, later ends.
Whoever has powder shoots.
Who brought the toneca smells always of friars.
Who has time does not wait time.
Who has time, has life.
Who has land, war.
Who wronged clamor against the accuser.
Who has all its on the one spot has it in the fire.
Who has a craft in hand, everywhere finds bread.
Who the vast intrepid sea has crossed, sometimes in the small rio drowned.
Who takes all the alleys, will find many dangers.
Whoever tastes it, won.
What goes around comes around.
Those who leave the old way for the new worst is.
Those who leave the old way for the new one knows what he leaves but he doesn't know what he finds.
Whoever leaves the old way for the new one, knows what he leaves but not what he finds.
Those who work with diligence prays twice.
Who works, God gives him.
Who sow seeds badly collects.
Anyone who was married once, feeling all his life.
Who evor lives, bad dies.
Who mistreated the beasts, never does it well.
Whoever always eats white pan, often want black.
Who always eats cake if you satiated.
Who meals for first mena twice.
Whoever speaks, often do it.
Who biting cannot not show your teeth.
Who shows sells.
Who dies lies and those who live peace.
Who dies lies, whoever lives is peace.
Who born afflicted died disconsolate.
Who comes from the cat touches mice.
Those born is beautiful, those who married is good and those who die is holy.
Chi crazy never heals.
Those born round cannot die square.
Those who do not love beasts, does not love Christians.
Who doesn't open your mouth, it doesn't rain inside.
Those who do not drink in company or is a thief or is a spy.
Who does not hunt does not take.
Those who do not start does not end.
Who doesn't believe to be crazy, really crazy.
Who does not believe in God, does not believe in the devil.
Who does not give Christ, gives the tax.
Who is not with me is against me.
Who is not fox, from the wolf you look at it, because it will prey early or late.
Who was not a good soldier, will not be a good captain.
Those who have no dog, hunting with cat.
Those who have no faith cannot give.
Who doesn't have the cat keeps mice and whoever has them keeps us both.
Those who have not learned to obey, will never be able to command.
Whoever has no legs.
Those who do not have a good legs.
Those who do not intend their writing is a donkey of nature.
Who does not work does not eat.
Those who do not eat has already eaten.
Whoever dies is reviewed.
Who no shipwrecked at sea can be wrecked in port.
Who can't break the horse, club saddle.
Nothing ventured nothing gained.
Nothing ventured nothing gained.
Those who do not know how to adulate can not reign.
Who can't do, cannot command.
Who can't read his writing is a donkey of nature.
Those who know nothing is not good at nothing.
Those who can't silence don't know.
Those who do not know how to obey, cannot command.
Those who do not follow the parents' council, laid down.
Those who do not sow does not collect.
Who doesn't fall in love as a young man, falls in love with old.
Those who found shadow in the summer, will find it in winter.
Who does not want to be recommended, cannot be helped.
Those who speak two languages is double man.
Those who speak little, says so much.
Whoever sins in secret makes public penance.
Who sheeps, wolf eats it.
Who sheep makes himself the wolf if he eats it.
Who for grace prays, has never well.
Whoever loses always wrong.
Who forgives without forgetting, does not forgive what half.
Who fishing with the golden hook, something always sees.
Who fishing and hurry, thick times takes crabs.
Who takes lion in absence, fears the mole in the presence.
Whoever most would like.
Whoever most wants.
Who works most, less eat.
Whoever makes himself pope.
Who most has it more.
Who more knows, less trusts.
Whoever spends less spends.
Those who soon know soon he speaks.
Who brings flowers, brings love.
Who seeks the desert loses the sermon.
Who takes the eel for the tail, can say they don't hold anything.
Whoever speaks, little Sa.
Whoever comes best to stay.
Who first born first graze.
Whoever does not think then sighs.
Whoever hurts for good, will never see the polish house from his home.
Those who remember a benefit, the chain it.
Who laughs on Friday cries on Sundays.
Whoever stays in the humble state, has no fall.
Thank you don't want to want any obligations.
Those thanks for a priga, receives a manna.
Who saves today, very much will have.
Who Rome does not see, nothing believes.
Those who pay pay and the shards are his.
Those who pay pay and the shards are his.
Who steals little go to jail, who steals so much career.
Who steals little, steals very much.
Who steals a kingdom is a glorifxxy thief, and who a handkerchief, a castigate thief.
Whoever steals once is a thief.
Whoever grew up.
Whoever helps you help you.
Who knows does and who does not know.
Those who know the game does not teach.
Who knows the makeup does not teach you.
Who knows without Christ knows nothing.
Whoever discovers the secret loses faith.
Who sow good grain will have good bread; Who sowing lupine will have neither pan nor wine.
Who sows with water collects with the basket.
Who sows it collects.
Who sows on the sand collects only anger.
Who Seeds wind shall harvest storm.
Serbian Serbian to the cat.
Who can be content enjoyed.
Those who delight to defeat others, should not be complained if others deceive him.
Who has burned with hot water also fear of cold water.
Who gets his campaigns hundred years old.
Anyone who makes a idol of his interest is a martyr of his integrity.
Who trusts Greek, does not have the Seco cerener.
Who trusts in the lot, does not eat cooked.
Whoever looks at the Moscow football, touches that of the horse.
Those who imagine being more than what is looked into the mirror.
Those who praise smear.
Whoever takes love, leaves anger.
Anyone who apologizes accuses.
Whoever resembles you.
Those who get married in a hurry.
Who humiliates will be enhanced, whoever enhances will be humiliated.
Those who boast alone is not a bean.
Who boasts of the crime is two times delinquent.
Who sits down, sit well.
Who is between two saddles is located with CXXO on the ground.
Who keeps silent consents.
Whoever tights in front of the force loses its right.
Who so many and who nothing.
Who arrives, badly houses.
Who caresses you beyond what soles, surely deceives you.
Who gives you a bone you wouldn't want you dead.
Who wants you badly, you smooth your hair.
Who holds the manure in his manure, makes his haystack sad.
Who keeps the ladder is no less thief.
Whoever begins, little ends.
Who too and who nothing.
Those who are too high goes, often falls.
Who too pulls the break.
Whoever wants nothing to tighten.
Who finds a friend finds a treasure.
Whoever wants angry dies.
Who kills cats hurt his facts.
Those who go hunting must not leave the rifle at home.
Who goes to Rome loses the armchair.
Who goes to the mill is infarin.
Who goes to the August water, does not drink or does not want to drink the must.
Who goes to the age, loses the place.
Who goes to the party and is not invited, Ben is driven out.
Who goes with the lame, learn to limp.
Who goes Slow and steady wins.
Who goes Slow and steady wins. Those who go strong go to death.
Whoever goes away loses the place to the tavern.
Who boasts himself and lowers others, others will lower him.
Who sells a lot of spaccia belief: loses friends and quattrins never has.
Whoever wins is always right.
Those who live in dreams have less needs.
Whoever lives in freedom does not try the fate.
Those who live six days in the oasis, the seventh anno the desert.
Time will tell.
Whoever vuoli d'oats a barn seeds of February.
Who wants clear water go to the source.
Whoever wants to be free, does not put the neck under the yoke.
Whoever wants to be paid, must not be thanked.
Whoever wants to heal must suffer.
Whoever wants to be impetrated, shame has to be removed.
Who wants to work worthy of iron and little wood.
Whoever vuol bread, mani mani.
Whoever wants to impoverish soon, ask for loan to wear.
Who wants to try the penalties of hell, is in Puglia and at the winter eagle.
Whoever wants to know what hell is the summer cook and the winter carter.
Whoever wants a beautiful haystack of the plants of February.
Who wants to see Pisa go to Genoa.
Who wants to enrich in a year, is hanged in six months.
Whoever wants very, don't ask little.
Those who want to be loved to become lovable.
Those who want to be sure of its flour, must bring the bag itself to the mill.
Who wants saints if they pray.
Who wants her daughter caress her mother.
Who wants to go and those who don't want to send.
Who wants to go, those who don't want to send.
Clear New Year's Eve, gives momentum to a happy new year.
Nail Scaccia Nail.
Nail crush nail.
Guitar and staple make the house galoped.
It takes nothing more than a bug of people to make an army.
It takes ingenuity to govern crazy.
Each is the artefice of his own fortune.
Each is the artefice of his luck.
Each brings his ingenuity to the market.
Sky with water pecorelle with catinelle.
Pecorelle sky, rain with catinelle.
What is bad for one, it is good for another.
What the fool is done in the end, the Savio does in principle.
What you can't change you have to know how to endure.
With the fire you don't joke.
With fire, with the woman and with the sea, there is little to joke.
With Latin, with a buzzing and with a florin the world turns around.
Nothing is done with nothing.
With bread all trouble are sweet.
Over time and straw mature the medlar.
With time and straw mature the robbies and rogue.
Glue alone loyalty, the headset laces are not paid.
How you will do so you will have.
How the feet carry the body, so the benevolence brings the soul.
Start, that God provides for the rest.
Compar of Puglia, a hold and the other strips.
Community service ingratitude makes.
With art and with ingenuity, you buy half a kingdom; And with ingenuity and art, you buy the other part.
With mouth and tongue castigate, many penaltis you will have saved.
With the crazy people there aren't patti.
With if and with the story is not done.
With the ink, a hand can raise a cunning and lower a gentlower.
With his wife to the side man is always blessed.
With patience the mulberry leaf becomes silk.
With the stone you feel gold, with gold the woman and with the woman man.
With the highest freedom, he lives the lowest servitude.
With tears and moans do not take care of teeth.
With good ways you get everything.
With the hands of another it is easy to touch the fire.
With a glass of wine you make a friend.
With an eye fries the fish and with the other you look at the cat.
With a bit of courage every trip is finished.
Conchiuder League is easy, difficult to keep it.
Confidence takes reverence.
It counts more the practice than grammar.
Peasants, big shoes and fine brains.
They count the facts than words.
Against two women even the devil can put the beak.
Against two couldn't Orlando.
Against the force the reason is not worth.
Against the fog force no is worth.
Lingle early, get up early, give health, wealth and wisdom.
Body SATOLO consumed soul.
Body Sati does not believe fasting.
The hare runs a piece, a piece the dog; Thus the human events alternate.
Sheet courtesy, question does not wait.
WHAT CAPO HAS.
Fat kitchen, lean heritage.
Great talented cuor.
Cuor happy the Ciel helps you.
Cuor happy the ciel looks at him.
Cuor content doesn't feel hard.
An April every drop val thousand lire.
D'Aquila does not born dove.
Bully fault is born.
What is what is born.
As well as taken care of, sheet and brother-in-law keep your wife away because they are malfidated.
From false language, bad arringa.
From Lodi, all Passan willingly.
From hospital and cemetery you go out more and more sincere.
An order is born from a disorder.
From friends you look at me, what do I watch me from the enemies.
From friends you look at me that you watch me from the enemies.
He gives him, the onions become at.
From the Sicilian judges, go to the chickens in the hands.
The bird is known from the song.
The tree is known from the fruit.
From the past it is easy to predict the future.
From the donkey do not look for wool.
The painter is known from the image.
The teacher is known from the work.
The master is known from the house.
The artist is recognized by his hand.
Danaro and Holiness, half of the middle.
Date to Caesar what is Caesar.
There is no excellence in front of the waiter.
In front of the abyss and behind the teeth of a wolf.
Weak Moving chain can great weight.
The vices is queen the avarice.
In the hindsight they are full of them.
Of the hindsight, they are full the pits.
I don't care about the Calendas as long as I can't do it in San Paolo.
Denari and holiness half of the half.
Said without act, everyone seems a misdeed.
Of good intentions it is paved inferno.
Who is the donkey, take it out for the tail.
Of pain you don't die, but of joy. Yes.
Of May you sleep for tasting.
Of Malerba you don't make a good hay.
Of what you don't care, don't say nor well or bad.
Of all the Maestro Arts is love.
The Serpe says: I don't touch me that you don't touch.
December phavaio.
They say that he is also merchant who loses, but this soon reduced to the greenery.
Ten think of the mouse and one hundred cat.
Behind the rice comes crying.
Tell me who you go and I'll tell you who you are.
Tell me who you go, and I'll tell you what you do.
God help the poor, because the rich can help himself.
God loves to talk to those who love ten.
God gives the plague and also gives medicine.
God heals and the doctor thanked.
God makes them and then couples them.
God sends the cold according to clothes.
God look at me by those who study a book alone.
God measures the wind to the tosato lamb.
God sees and provides.
God, if closing a door, opens a door.
Disgrace and tavern make the same way.
He said the fox to his children: "When in Tudi, when in Grilli".
Sweet words and sads made deceive sad and crazy.
Pain communiqué immediately scented.
Asking you go to Rome.
Asking is lawful, responding is courtesy.
Woman adorned, late comes out and late returns.
Woman at the wheel, constant danger.
Woman baffuta always liked.
Woman bearded with stones salutes.
Bearded woman, always liked.
White woman, little misses.
Woman singing gently on stage, pei Inexperienced young is a siren.
Woman giving, rarely is good.
Woman crying, horse sweating, are more false than Judas.
Woman crying, ovver sweet singing, are two different, both mighty charms.
Woman who knows Latin is rare, but watched from taking her in inspiration.
Woman and fire, little touches.
Woman and wine drunk great and the little one.
Young woman and old man can fill the house of children.
Woman I know, which is a Santa at Mass and that at home it is an orrilizer.
Woman Nana All Tana.
Nobil woman by nature is a treasure that always lasts.
Hairy woman, virtuous woman.
Prayed woman denies, neglected Pray.
Prudent woman, excellent joy.
Red thigh red woman.
Savia and beautiful woman is also precious in the skirt.
Woman tapping, woman gets duole, woman knows when she wants.
Women and oxen of your countries.
Women and cars joys and sorrows.
Women and sardines, are good tiny.
Women and jealous men are too dangerous.
Women, damage, make men and crash them.
After dining not to walk; After dinner, with sweet Lena.
After the sweet comes the bitterness.
After the fact the advice is not valid.
After the fact, repentance comes too late.
After the day comes the night.
After God's grace, the best thing is freedom.
After the storm, the sun.
After the flenched clouds the sol shining more shiny.
After harvest, funnel.
Where is innocence not lacking Providence.
Where there is taste, there is no matter.
Where there is love, the leg drags the foot.
Where there are women in love is useless to keep tight doors.
Where it is punishment is discipline, where it is peace is joy.
Where luck enters, humility comes out.
Where the accidia takes care of everything perfection.
Where fidelity puts the roots, God makes a tree grow.
Where Men is thought to break Po.
Where there is no love, there is no humanity.
Where there is no hay, the horses eat straw.
Where there is no order, there is disorder.
Where it is not believed either in hell or paradise, the devil pockets all revenue.
Where there is no education, there is no honor.
Where there is no hair, badly combed.
Where can wine can silence.
Where the bacco and love reigns, Minerva does not let himself be seen.
Where wine reigns, silence reigns.
Where son are ram.
Where are the chicks, there is the eye of the chioccia.
Where the heart flies, strips the reason.
Two dogs that one bone have, hardly in peace are.
Two walnuts in a sack and two women in the house make a nice fracasso.
Two Polente together never seen.
He lasts a broken wagon than a new one.
Hard with hard it doesn't make good wall.
It's bad hollow what doesn't go back to the call.
It's hard to make a dark white.
It is difficult to look at thieves.
It is difficult to bend an old tree.
It is difficult to limit well in front of the piancato.
It's easy to complain when there are those who listen.
It is impossible to ride a ray of sunshine.
It is impossible to fly without wings.
It is useless to cry on the poured milk. truism
It is the water that makes the vegetable garden.
It's the woman who makes the man.
He is mild cunning gelosia, which everything believes when he is in frenzy.
It is better to take care of a lot of fleas than a woman.
It is better to content that complaining.
It is better to correct your defects, which resumes those of others.
It is better to be fasting out, which SATOLO in prison.
It is better to be eel's head than sturgeon tail.
It is better to be bird of wood, which cage kill.
It is better to be humble on horseback, proud to walk.
It is better to freeze in the naked bedroom of the truth, which bask in the fur of the lie.
It is better to eat the inheritance, which preserves it for the convent.
It is better to deserve praise that you get it.
It is better to hear the nightingale singing, which dull the mouse.
It is better lizard head than dragon tail.
It is better a deer army under the command of a lion, which a lion army under the command of a deer.
A lion is better than a thousand flies.
It is easier to blame that improving.
It is easier to complain, which removes the imperative.
It is easier to find the absinthe sweet, which in the midst of a few women silence.
It is a nice preach full body fast.
It is a good answer what is attached to each question.
It's a thief who steals and who holds him the bag.
A lean agree of a fat sentence is better.
Jews and rigattieri, spend little and gobbano willingly.
Here is the remedy for hypochondria: eating and drinking in good company.
Errare is human, disregarded.
Wrong is human, persevering is diabolical.
Error is not deception.
Error does not pay debt.
Recognized error leads to truth.
Being a little shady, when others don't know it.
It is more torque that is not the water of macaroni.
It makes more damage than the disease.
It does what the priest says, not what the priest does.
Do what others do, and nobody will make you.
Do good and forgotten, it's bad and think about it.
Beautiful face, beautiful soul.
Easy is to criticize, difficult is art.
Children, poor and chickens, are never Satolli.
Making debts is not ashamed, but paid them is a matter of honor.
Doing teach.
Making love is good for love.
Do good to the village, you will say that you do wrong.
Made the law found deception.
Donkey facts and everyone will put the soma.
Make honey and you will eat the flies.
Get your wings and then fly.
February, FEBRIETTO Short and damn month.
Happy is not, whoever doesn't know.
Females and hens, if Giran too much are lost.
Love injury does not kill.
Trusting is good, not trusting is better.
Trust of art, but not of the artisan.
As long as there is life there is hope.
As long as the man teeth in his mouth, he never knows what touches.
To the coffin always becomes.
Fortress that parliament, is close to surrender.
Blind luck, his blinds.
Fortunate fools the one who favors.
Fortunate to the game, unlucky in love.
Among the two quarrilos the third enjoys.
It was never prior between modest.
Between buried treasure and hidden science, I don't know any difference.
Between a usurer and a little killer there is.
Early fruit easily broke.
Prohibited fruit, tasty fruit.
Escape the water under the gutter.
Mushrooms and poets: for a good ten villain.
Hen singing made the egg.
Hen that does not catch has already caught.
Hen racing already raided.
Old chicken makes good soup.
Rooster without ridge is a capon, no beard man is a minchione.
Increanative cat never took mouse.
Svented kittens, make cats.
Cat and woman at home, dog and man out.
Help cat becomes lion.
Hot water screwed, fear of cold.
Jealousy does not rotate.
Cheerful people, the Ciel helps her.
Tried people, named and view.
Villano game hand game.
Hand game, Villano game.
Joy and disaster always does not last.
Young good heart, good industries, grow bad for little education.
Turn turns, the arrow falls on to those who pull it.
June the scythe in his fist.
The clothes and men soon age.
The dresses and costumes are mutable.
The clothes are cold, but they receive the heat from those who carry them.
The new loves make the old forget.
The heirs of the warning are omnipotent, because the dead can resurrect.
The heretics steal the word of God.
The mistakes of others are our best masters.
Doctor's mistakes covers the earth.
Errors do not know each other until they are committed.
The errors are paid.
The extremes touch.
Idols separate Pope and Emperor.
The eyes touched with the elbows.
Fools make the holidays and notices if they enjoy them.
Birds from the same feathers must stay in the same nest.
Honest men do not fear or light or darkness.
Hobby in Ponente Crescent Luna, Hobba at Levante Luna.
Adulator gorge, open sepulcher.
Oftenous gout, never sealed.
Great Justice, great offense.
Great love, great pain.
Greek at sea, Greek on the table, Greek not having to do a seco.
Cranes and women fans willingly the nest at the top.
Look him, daughter, look at it all, the man without money is ugly.
Watching and don't touch is something to learn.
Watched by a wretched dog and suspicious man.
Look from those who turn on the fire and then cries against the flames.
Look from those who swear in conscience.
Watched by those who don't care about your reputation.
Look from those who laugh and look somewhere.
Look at three things: from a fiery horse, by man infido and by a woman sergungata.
Look at all those things that can harm the soul and the body.
Look at the children who listen: even small vessels have ears.
Look at the crazy, drunk, hypocrites and minchioni.
Look at the riots, and you will not be a witness or part.
Look at the defamate, because the tests are difficult.
Look at the old Turkish and the young Serbian.
Watched by hypocrisy, because it is a bad disease.
Look at the spring of January.
Look at your life not to give Niun denial.
War, plague and famine, always go to company.
He has nice mentir who comes from afar.
He has a hundred times a man phlegm and judgment, he runs to the precipice to the one.
He has justice in his hand scale and sword, because the right rise and the impium falls.
He has more the rich in a corner, which the poor throughout the house.
It has a good taste of the gain smell.
He has a courage to lion, what does not violence to the weak.
I've seen a very unscathed little piccol, become deadly.
The kisses are like cherries: one pulls each other.
Dogs bark as they are fed.
The bad examples are easily imitated, minus the good ones.
Debts are the closest heirs.
The batch denies if they are galloped.
The Denari serve to the poor of benefit, and to the great torture farm.
Desires do not fill the bag.
The gifts of enemies are dangerous.
Children become men and girls brides.
The children and drunks fall into the hands of God.
The facts of the pot knows the lid.
The children of cats eat mice.
The children are the wealth of the poor.
The children are pieces of heart.
The flowers so much perfumes for the poor as for the rich.
The friars do not bow to the abbot, but at the bunch of his keys.
Shrimps are good in the months of the Erre.
Cats and real men always fall standing.
The geniuses meet.
Parents love children, more than children parents.
Young people want to be more realized than old.
The oaths of lovers are like those of the sailors.
The crabs are full when the moon is round.
The troubles of the pot knows the ladle that scrambling them.
The big thieves hang up the little ones.
The loquacas and boasters are badly seen by all.
Mats and girls have an angel from theirs.
The crazy festivals and savi enjoy them.
The doctors want to be old, rich pharmacists and young barbers.
My dates are sweeter, says the mistletoe growing on the palm. Wellaism
Dirty clothes are washed at home.
Dirty clothes were washed in the family.
The paperki want to carry the geese.
Relatives are like shoes: the more narrow, more hurt.
The crazy grow without watering them.
Crazy and girls can say what they want.
Crazy for letter are the biggest crazy.
Crazy are known by gestures.
Youth sins are crying in old age.
The mountain pips were going to play and were played.
The poets are born, and the speakers form.
The poor seek eating for the stomach; And the rich stomach to eat.
The poor have health and rich medicines.
Harvest fleas holds man and not females.
The rich must console the poor.
The reproaches of the father more than the mother's woods.
Money does not buy happiness.
Real friends are like white flies.
The «SE» and the «but» are two corbelleries from Adam in here.
Best of a year goes into a blasphemy.
The well to do is never late.
The bisper trottar the old woman.
The ox says cuckold to asino.
The ox eats the hay because it remembers that it was grass.
Good morning starts in the morning.
Good order is son of disorder.
Coffee must be as hot as hell, black as the devil, pure as an angel and sweet like love.
The warmth of the sheets does not boil the pot.
The dog I fed is what biting me.
The dog is the best friend of man.
The dog bites the fell.
The fearful dog barks stronger.
The dog rodes the bone because it cannot swallow it.
Coal or scald or dye.
The crocodile eats the man and then cries.
The colombo that remains in dovecote is safe from the hawk.
The most expensive color to the Jews is yellow.
The farmer has big and brain shoes up.
The courage covers the hero better than shield the coward.
The body and soul laugh at those who get up early in the morning.
The crow cries the sheep and then eats it.
Bad Cuor makes ingratitude per benefit.
The Magnanimo Cuor with little love, and the heart of the fool with little adulation.
The heart has its reasons and does not mean reason.
The giving is honor, asking is pain.
The crime should not be tolerated, but even less should be approved.
The money is the nerve of the war.
Money can a lot, but love can everything.
The dentist eats with the teeth of others.
The devil is well lets himself go for the tail, but he doesn't let her snatch.
The devil makes the pots but not the lids.
The devil is not as ugly as he paints it.
The devil wants to make a cappuccino.
The devil wants himself holy.
The difficult is starting.
The asking is hindsight, responding is obligation.
The gift of the villain is similar to his master.
The doubt is a father of knowledge.
Making teaches to do.
The fact cannot undo.
Horse iron that resonates, needs a nail.
The iron is hard, but the fire makes it soft.
The son to his father beyond his mother.
The thin thread easily tears up.
The fire that doesn't burn me, I don't turn it off.
The fire that does not heat me, I don't want to have shook me.
The cat loves the fish, but does not want to get wet the legs.
The grumbled cat always, even when it enjoys.
The cat that has burned, is also afraid of cold water.
The cat is a domestic tiger.
The cat licks today, tomorrow scratches.
The cat is not cat if it is not a thief.
The cat does not caress you, caresses close to you.
The generous has never enough money.
The gentleman only asks for honey, but the gentlewoman also wants wax.
The game is beautiful when it lasts little.
The game, the lot, the woman and the fire never contains little.
The idling young man will be an old needy.
The judgment is the work of God.
The rare grain is not ashamed to the hague.
The Greek says the truth only once a year.
The complaining does not fill empty room.
Working without praying, it is a barrel without wine, and gold without splendor.
The ennobled work man.
The bed is called rosa, if you don't sleep.
The lot is the fee of the imbeciles.
The lot is a continuous deception.
The wolf does not cca lambs.
The wolf loses the hair but not the vice.
The wolf when catching a sheep, already looks at another.
Magnanimo is superior to aniria, injustice, pain.
Magnanimo does not resort to astrow.
The evil that has no shelter is good to keep it hidden.
The worst evil of Mali is fear.
Evil comes in large quantities, and it goes away gradually.
Marriage is the grave of love.
The early bird catches the worm.
The pitiful doctor makes the plague smelly.
The pitiful doctor makes the verminous plague.
The best is enemy of good.
The mesh fattens in a cage, the lion dies of anger.
Honey is not made for donkeys.
The best mirror is an old friend.
The best dice shooting is not playing.
The great thank Mindevxxa asker of the other.
The world is done at stairs, there are those who go down and there are those who go up.
The world rewards like the captone that gives horny to its master.
The mill of God milled but thin corn.
The nano is small even if it is on the bell tower.
The past must be a teacher of today.
The past must not borrow from today.
The worst step is that of the Using.
The worst deaf is what you don't want to hear.
The fish stinks from the head.
Piedmont is the burial of the French.
The most knows the less.
The poet gets the palms, but not the dates.
The politician kisses with her mouth, and pulls her feet.
Portugal is small, but it is a piece of sugar.
The poor cannot and the rich does not want.
The first love does not rust.
The first love is never forgotten.
The first year embraces us, the second band, the third year is the disease and the bad Easter.
The foal does not go to the fee, if the mare trotta.
The branch resembles the trunk.
The rich has much need the poor, how much the poor of the rich.
The rich lives, the poor lively.
Thank you don't hurt your mouth.
Thank you don't pay debt.
The rice abounds on the mouth of fools.
Rice abounds on the mouth of fools.
The rice was born in the water but must die in the wine.
The knowledge is of all.
The SATOLO does not believe in the fell.
Silence is gold and the silver word.
Silence is golden.
Silence, often, is an eloquent sermon.
The sleep of reason generates monsters.
The sospirar is not worth.
The superfluous of the rich is the necessary of the poor.
The touch is tactics.
The touch is all.
Time is money.
Time is a great doctor.
Time discovers everything, because it is a gentleman.
Time flies.
The end of the night is the beginning of the day.
The fear also trotes the lame.
The wrong is never from one side.
The too handling is crazy.
Too stroubles.
Too much pull, the bow breaks.
The Turkish can become a duct, but a man gears.
The belly has no ears.
The real infirm is what does not want to heal.
The wine with flavor, color bread.
The good wine is sold without Frasca.
The wine is good for those who know.
The wine is strong but sleep wins, but the stronger of everything is the woman.
Wine is old milk.
The wine is half board.
The wine makes the old dance.
The wine in the morning is lead, at half silver, the golden evening.
The wine makes the secrets look forward to.
Learn to live the fool at his expense, the Savio to those of others.
Learn from the past, believe in the future and live in the present.
Learn the art and put it aside.
In love and war no rules.
In love and in war everything is lawful.
In the mouth closed not entering flies.
The devil is even deceived in Campania.
In the shoemaker's house you don't have shoes.
In the Devil's house don't talk about water.
In the house of Galantuomo the female was born and then the man.
In one hundred pounds of law, there is no ounce of love.
In church with saints and in tavern with Ghiottoni.
In the company he took a friar.
In February the wiper makes the nest.
In Lazio we are born with the stones in his hand.
In long journeys also the straw weighs.
In paradise you don't go to a carriage.
In Sardinia there are no snakes, nor in Piedmont blasphemies.
In so much inconstancy and quantity of human things, nothing, if not what has passed, is safe.
In the ground of blind, blessed who has an eye.
In the land of thieves, the suitcase before.
In an hour God works.
In a poorly washed vase, the wine is spoiled.
Engain and hair, they grow only with the years.
Together it does not go on a canopy and beauty.
Inventing is little, spread the invention is everything.
The bark of dogs does not arrive in heaven.
Abundance does not let the rich sleep.
The fir shadow believes to make fruits.
The fir grows in height, but the fern grows in width.
The dress does not make the priest.
Abuse teaches true use.
Water Cheta ruins bridges.
Water runs to the sea.
The water of May deceives the village: par that does not rain and get the gull.
Water and fire are good servants, but bad masters.
Water makes the vegetable garden.
Water hurts and wine makes you sing.
Water makes the poles rot.
Water Vuol slope The sea vuol patience.
The tree recognizes from the fruits.
The joy of the bad guys lasts little.
Cheerfulness is every harm the universal remedy.
Joy is the condition of life.
Cheerfulness makes it live, the passion makes you duple.
Allegria also like God.
The joy drives every evil.
The lark flies up, but does its nest on the ground.
The height is half beauty.
Ambition and revenge always die of hunger.
Ambition is enemy of reason.
The friend certainly knows in the interference.
Carnival love dies in Lent.
Love is blind, but see far.
Love is blind.
Love and cough cannot be hidden.
Love passes time and time passes love.
Love is not nice if it's not quarrel.
Love is not measured to meters.
Love passes into the mouth of a needle.
Love the more beast, especially sublime.
Love warms the heart and anger does the poet.
Love without kissing is bread without salt.
The soul makes the noble and not blood.
The year produces the harvest, not the field.
Appearances are deceiving.
The appetite does not vuol sauce.
The appetite is eating.
The orange in the morning is gold, the silver day, the evening is lead.
The rainbow in the morning bathes the beak of the hen; The rainbow in the evening good time mena.
Art has no major enemy of the ignorant.
The donkey and the mule track do not have the same thought.
The donkey knows the tail, if not when he doesn't have it anymore.
The very enough and the too much faulty.
The story is like pig, it's good after dead.
The story in death regrets the money spent for the coffin.
The avar leaves ratent heirs.
The story does not sleep.
The avaro does not live, Vegeta.
The adversity fleece the weak hearts, swallows the strong souls.
Excess obligations can make a friend lose.
The excess of joy shall sadness, and the excess of wine drunkenness.
The exception confirms the rule.
The sun eclipse takes place during the day and not at night.
The ivy taciturn climbs at the top of the oak.
The elephant does not care for the flea bite.
Begging does not impoverish.
The eloquence of the villain is false acumen.
Epiphany All holidays take away.
Bad grass never dies.
The grass I don't want, grows in the garden.
The grass of the neighbor is always greener.
The grass does not grow on the highway.
The grass I want not even growing in the garden of the king.
The paternal heritage to paterners, maternal to materners.
The error that confesses is remedied.
The error is human, the divine forgiveness.
The error is a coachman leading over a false road.
The exercise is a good teacher.
The experience in the world leads to distrust, the distrust leads to the suspicion, the suspicion of astresses, cunning to wickedness and evil to everything.
The experience without knowledge is better than knowledge without wisdom.
Summer led her Sant'Urbano and autumn San Bartolomeo.
Summer front and winter behind.
The summer of San Martino lasts three days and a few.
Summer is a slave, winter a master.
Summer for those who work, winter for those who sleep.
The summer for the poor is better than winter.
Eternity is a long shopping.
Eternity has no gray hair.
The Eternal speaker nor hears or learn.
Idol is adored until it is broken.
The ignorant has the wings of an eagle and the eyes of an owl.
The ink is my field, on which I can write valiantly; the pen, my plow; Words, mine seed.
The ink is black, and dyes your fingers and reputation.
Hell and tribunals are always open.
The ingenuity comes with the years, and goes away with the years.
The ingratitude converts the hot blood into ice.
The ingratitude is the left hand of selfishness.
The ingratitude is a amate root from which bitter fruit grow.
The ingratitude also harms to those who are not Reo.
The ingratitude cuts the nerves to the benefit.
The intellect is in the head and not over the years.
The intellect never comes before the years.
Winter at the fire and summer in the shade.
Envy is annexed to happiness.
Envy is an owl that cannot endure the light of the prosperity of others.
Envy is a beast that rodes their legs, when it has nothing else from roding.
The envy resembles the gramigna, which never dies, and from for everything to theigna.
Hypocrisy pockets money, and the truth goes beyond.
IRA without strength, no rind is worth.
IRA disturbs the mind and accjure the reason.
Italy is the country where it runs milk and honey.
Italy is a paradise inhabited by Demons.
Italy to be born, France to live there and Spain to die.
Opportunity makes the thief.
The mistake of the master fattens the horse.
The eye is the mirror of the soul.
Today it does not have to slander the past.
The Blessed olive tree Vuol find clean and net.
The shadow of a prince must be liberality.
The order hunt the disorder.
The order is bread, the disorder is hungry.
Pride believes that his egg has two egg yolks.
Pride is foolishness, humility is saviety.
Pride has breakfast with plenty, lunch with poverty and dinner with shame.
The love watch always delays.
The guest is like fish: after three days smells.
The guest and the fish after three days regrettes.
Ozio is the father of the vices.
Ozio is the father of all vices.
Ozio in youth is not the path of virtue.
Equality and measure everyone with the same span, is the law of death.
Humililing is wise, the prominition is from the beast.
Humiliation goes behind the superb.
Humility is the best way to avoid humiliation.
Humility is the crown of all virtues.
Humility is the mother of honor.
Humility is a virtue that adorns the old age as much as youth.
Humility often gets more than alterment.
Humility is good at all.
Humility is fine with chastity.
Unity is strength.
The army man and the eye are insatiable.
The man believes true everything he wants.
The man must keep his mouth open a long time before he has to do with a roasted colombo.
The man was created to work, like the bird to fly.
The miserable man is a dead man walking.
Man wanders and luck weaves.
The man for the word and the ox for the horns.
The politician lights a candle to God and another to the devil.
Man proposes and God has.
The man proposes and the woman has.
The man proposes, God has.
Man knows to the glass.
Man feels sick from appearance.
The wear enriches, but does not last.
The wear is the best apostle of the devil.
The wear is the firstborn daughter of the avarice.
Wear is a murder.
Wear is prohibited by God.
Wear wakes up when man sleeps.
The usurium enriches with the Sudor of the poor.
The usurer has a blood press.
The fattening usurium goes for a walk.
The blasphemy turns revolves back to those who pull it.
The lie has a short legs.
The good wine cellar makes good wine.
The good mother makes a good daughter.
Calm is the virtue of the strong.
Capacity is seen in difficulties.
Famine is wearing bread.
The best meat is the one around the bone.
The meat without a broth does.
The pulley does not blend, if it is not greasy.
The cicada first sings and then dies.
Modern civilization is the infinite multiplication of unnecessary needs.
The queue is the longest to argue.
Comfort makes the bad man.
Compassion is the daughter of love.
Contentness comes from the guts.
The string too tense breaks.
Cupidigia breaks the bag.
The diet every pain.
The difficulty is in the beginning.
The mistrust pointed to the eyes.
The mistrust is the death of love.
The distrust leads ahead of trust.
The woman won jokes, in Brilla, to Love, in Brama, to hear, to you and pay.
The woman needs to practice her one day, a month and a summer to know what odor knows.
The good woman is worth a crown.
The woman must have three m: matron in the street, modest in church, housewife at home.
The woman and the vegetable garden want a somewhat master.
The woman is mobile, the man is carpenter.
The woman has more whims than curly.
The woman knows more about the devil.
The idle woman cannot be virtuous.
The woman for a child is, wins the devil in Furberia.
The most silly woman is worth two men.
The woman too in sight is easy to conquer.
The woman, first honey, then all of you.
Hunger hunting wolf from the woods.
Hunger hunting wolf from the den.
Hunger season all the food.
Hunger is bad counselor.
Hunger is the best condiment.
Hunger brings out the wolf from the woods.
Hunger the beans in almonds.
Hunger does not see the mold in bread.
Hunger pushes the wolf in the village.
Hunger, Grand Maestra, even the beasts trains.
The devil's flour is all in bran.
Loyalty is never repelled enough, and infidelity never enough.
The female is something mobile by nature.
The end of the passion is the principle of repentance.
Fortune favors the bold.
The Fortune of the Savio has told him.
Luck is blind.
The hurry is bad counselor.
The hurry breaks the pot.
Fury was never good.
The nearby hen looks like a pheasant.
The hasty cat made blind kittens.
The hurried cat made blind mici
The fat cat honors the house.
The cat does not get up to the pot that bubbles.
The cat would like to eat fish, but don't fish.
The cat puts the foot in front of the cow.
The wife's jealousy is the way to his divorce.
Jealousy is the worst of all evils.
Jealousy is a passion that seeks as much as torment.
The generosity is a wall that cannot be raised higher than the materials arrive.
Rich people badly raise his dogs, and people poor his children.
Savia people don't care about what you can't have.
Youth flees, and beauty blows.
Youth wants to make his course.
The drop digs the stone.
Loyalty has gone from the world and the right to sleep.
The league makes the weak strong.
Liberality is a wall that must not be raised higher than the materials.
Liberality is not in giving much, but wisely.
The freedom of the poor is to leave it begging.
Freedom is from God; The freedoms, from the devil.
Freedom is more expensive than the eyes and life.
Freedom ranks with his hands the thread of his tent.
The tongue hits where the tooth is in pain.
The language has no bone and knows how to break the dosso.
The Spanish language is the most lovable; When the devil tried eva, I talk to her in Spanish.
The proper praisewarts, that of my friends.
Lombardy is the garden of the world.
The moon of January is the wine moon.
The moon is a liar: when it does C decrease, and when it is the D growing
The moon does not care about the abbiaring of dogs.
The Luna holds the lumen to thieves.
The moon, if it does not heat, illuminates.
The mother of the imbecills is always pregnant.
The mother of the fools is always pregnant.
The worst mother is always pregnant.
Magnificence often covers poverty.
Mala grass never dies.
The new mala carries the wind.
The Malerba grows early.
Melancholy and treatments make old from age.
The best defense is the attack.
The best revenge is forgiveness.
Long soup sa di smoke.
Modesty is the date that rarely mature on the wealth tree.
Modesty is a mother of every creation.
The wife is the home key.
Death makes us equal in the burial, inequality in eternity.
The need pointed to ingenuity.
The night is made for the length.
The night brings counsel.
The gourmet belly is the cemetery of good foods.
The word that comes out weakens man, that retained reinforces it.
The word of the rich is similar to the sun, and that of the poor is similar to steam.
The word is silver, silence is gold.
Patience is the virtue of the strong.
Patience is a good grass, but it is not born in all gardens.
The patience will start in the carriage will return.
The sheep leaves alone, the wolf eats it.
The worst wheel is the one that strides.
The worst meat to know is that of man.
Penance runs behind sin.
The empty pot is the one that sounds.
The plant is known from the fruit.
Painting is a tacit poem, and poetry a Loquacious painting.
The polenta is useful for four things: serves as a soup, serves from bread, sazia and warm hands.
Poverty is devoid of many things, avarice is free of everything.
The first water is the one that bathes.
The first legacy to the first child, the last inheritance to the last child.
The first is forgiven, the second one is bast.
Providence What remains.
Prudence is never too much.
The flea coming out of the ear with the devil is recommended.
The whore and lettuce a hard season.
The frog is uses to the Pantani, if you don't go today we will go tomorrow.
The frog does not bite, because he has no teeth.
The frog, or jumps or piss, but never seam.
The race begins from the mouth.
The crazy stuff is the first to leave.
The wheel of fortune turns.
The wheel of fortune is not always one.
The wisdom of the past does not nourish the hungry.
The monkey is always monkey, even dressed in silk.
The rind is beautiful chestnut.
In the evening Leoni and in the morning Coglioni.
Hope is bad money.
Hope is the bread of the poor.
Hope is the patrimony of the poor.
Hope is the dream of the Desto man.
Hope is the last to die.
Hope is the best consolation in misery.
Hope is the best pain music.
Hope is the richness of the poor.
Hope is always green.
Hope is a balsam for the little ones.
Hope is a dream in the wake.
Hope also brings courage to the coward.
Hope enlarges, the experience gives up.
History is a teacher of life.
The pride went on horseback and walked back.
Superba is daughter of ignorance.
Superb shows ignorance.
The pride is riding and back on foot.
The land is a mother of all men and even burial.
Too much humility comes from pride.
Vainglory is a flower that never doesn't take fruit.
The old woman learn up to 100 years.
True freedom is not to serve the vice.
The truth is in wine.
The truth is always afloat.
The robe covers great defects.
The way of hell is paved with good intentions.
The dead viper does not bite breast, but also hurts with the poison's eyor.
Virtue is in the middle.
Life is short and art is long.
Life is already half spent rather than know what it is.
The fox that does not arrive at the lard says it is rancid.
The fox knows from the queue.
Tears of the heir is crazy who believes us.
Complaining, pleading and drinking water is lawful at all.
The leaf wide, tighten your say yours that I said mine.
Milk and wine, toxic up.
Lava Dog, combed dog, always dog stink.
He works as if I had to live Ognora, he loves how I had to die then.
Work never fattened ox.
The falls do not last.
The beautiful pens make the bird beautiful.
The beauties last to the doors, goodness until death.
The beasts should be treated as beasts.
The arms and hands of the poor belong to the rich.
Lies have short legs.
Lies are the shield of dapway men.
The bad new ones are the first to arrive.
The bad new flywheels.
The chatter don't make flour.
The keys and padlocks are not made for trusted fingers.
The doves that remain in dovecote, are secure from the Nibbio.
Long things become snakes.
Long things become Serpi.
Long things take vice.
The misfortunes are never alone.
Hand fingers are unequal.
Women have long hair and short brains.
Women have long hair and short brains.
Women have four diseases a year, and three months lasts every disease.
Women have seven souls ... and a half.
Women know one more than the devil.
Women piglian well fleas.
Tears are women's weapons.
The alloys and strings fredice do not last long.
Diseases tell us what we are.
The mountains are firm, men meet.
The morning hours have gold in the mouth.
The morning hours have gold in the mouth.
The words are females and the facts are males.
The words vain last as the circles on the water.
The plants that whisper too soon, dry.
The oaks don't lemons.
The girls are golden, the married silver, widows of copper and the old tin.
The frogs lost their tail because they didn't ask for help.
The roses fall, the thorns remain.
The wooden heads always fan of the loop.
The trentines come down pulp and hicks leave.
The eggs have nothing to teach the hen.
The ways of the Lord are infinite.
The streets of providence are endless.
Li Miricule de la fratta when bbun quand is done; When she was doing flickers slaughtered N'Gul Li Miricule.
Language Cheta and talking facts.
The yawn does not want to lie: or who is sleep or who would like to sleep, or who has something he can't say.
The cockroach always runs to the dung.
The scimunito speaks with his finger.
The scorpion sleeps under each plate.
Loose cyancia at war, the valent mute fights.
Loda the great field and the little cultivate.
Praise the mountain and stay on the floor.
I praise the madman and blow it, if you're not crazy you'll get it.
Start from the eyes, far from the heart.
Out of sight out of mind.
Out of sight out of mind.
July from the great heat, drink well and beat balance.
Bunch moon in January Racimoli moon in February.
Long tongue, short hand.
Long like Lent.
Long fast hunting hunger.
Lupo does not eat wolf.
But in love award Amor becomes.
May ortolano, a lot of straw and little grain.
The major the saint, greater his humility.
Men never know how to be grateful enough to inventors.
Never delayed those who came.
Mal common, half Gaudio.
Mal can make Reason of his fact who lard or fish leaves to guard the cat.
Mal will judge the horse from the saddle.
Evil who wants no duole.
Unknown badly fears doubly.
Evil not doing, fear not having.
Male wanted was never too much.
Damn the belly that of the Pan eating does not remember anything.
Missing so much patience to the poor as compassion to the rich.
Mangiar a lot and make good digestion, it's a privilege that Han few people.
Straight hand and Monda mouth can go around the world.
Genoese sailor, Florentine merchant.
Golden hammer does not break the doors of the sky.
March is crazy.
March soft, great for the plates.
March Pazzerello looks at the sun and take the umbrella.
Poker and bread make beautiful children; Bread without bat makes crazy children.
Old doctor and young surgeon.
Mediocre Livestock well graziuto is of greater advantage than very mantle livestock.
Better to go to bed without dinner, which get up with debts.
Better open reproach, which hate secret.
Better behind the birds, which behind the lords.
Better to be well educated, than noble born.
Better to be envied that compatible.
Better to serve in your own house, that the mistress in the house of others.
Better beans in freedom, that cappons in slavery.
Better thrust in Man who thrust to Frasca.
Better finch in pocket that throwing in Frasca.
Better loving husband, who with jealousy.
Better the egg today that the hen tomorrow.
Better to eat carrots in peace that many dishes in disound.
Better beggar than ignorant.
Better bread with love, cheese with pain.
Better little than nothing.
Better only than bad accompanied.
Better late than never.
Better a bright donkey that a dead doctor.
Better a gained florin, one hundred inherited.
Better a lean agreement that a fat sentence.
Better one death at home than a Pisan at the door.
Better a festival one hundred party.
Better once blush that a thousand pale.
Better to live well than living for a long time.
Less we are better.
Merit unknown little is true.
Milan can do, Milan can say, but it can't make water vin.
A thousand mistakes are more easily pronounced than a truth.
Wife and oxes of your country.
Wife Maglio.
Many things will judge you impossible to do before they are done.
Many hands make light work.
Many united straws can tie an elephant.
Many times the most adorable beauty joins the most unbearable stupidity.
Many times you lose for negligence what has been earned with justice.
Many have good cards in hand, but they can't play them.
Many invent gold with his mouth and lead to hands and feet.
Many speak of Orlando even if they never saw his Brando.
Many escape the penalty, but not to the remorses of consciousness.
Many imagine to have the chick, who still have no egg.
Many complain of good weather.
Many are the versipers, a few poets.
Many sharper a cat and swear that he was a lion.
Many votes make the abbot.
Much money, many friends.
Very smoke and little roasted.
Much can harm a small negligence.
Dry hunger in a bread sideboard.
The Serpe died, turned off the poison.
Dead a Pope does another.
Mule good mule, but bad beast.
The rich dies, they do the funeral; The poor dies, no one tells him: Vale.
Move the tail the dog not for you, but for bread.
Those who live al herself was born for nothing.
Christmas with yours, Easter with whoever you want.
He more kills his throat that the sword.
Neither of Venus, nor of Mars is not married, nor do he give principle to art.
Neither woman nor canvas with candlelit.
He kills him more bakers than Mars.
He kills him the throat that the sword.
He kills his language more than the sword.
Need makes law and court.
In equal orders, opinions are odd.
Women are known in drinking and walking.
In need, you know your friend.
In the cut woods there are no murderers.
In doubt bargain.
In the river that cries you can go safe.
In Monte di Brianza, without Vin does not die.
In the land of zuppi, Zoppicar is not ashamed.
In the country of blinds also a Guercio is king.
In the chicken coop there is no peace if he sings the hen and the rooster tax.
In the kingdom of the blind also a Guercio is re.
In the realm of the blind also an orb is king.
In the kingdom of God, poor and rich are the same.
In autumn no longer needs to dream of roses and tulips.
In the summer you must think of winter, and in the youth at old age.
In eternity you always arrive in time.
In winter the fool dreams of roses, and in summer the Savio gathers.
In the small barrel there is good wine.
In happiness reason, infelicity patience.
In gout, the doctor doesn't see gout.
In the misfortunes you know your friend.
Black with black does not dye.
No crown is more beautiful than that of humility.
No fortress is so welded that you don't let themselves be conquered from gold.
No injustice remains unpunished.
No apple is so beautiful that it has no fault.
No new, good new.
No one is a prophet at home.
No one is unlucky like the lamb: o is horned, or it is castrated or is scanned.
No one can give what he has no.
No one can defend himself from the mockery.
December snow lasts until the frost lasts.
Nothing is more beautiful than a cheerful face.
Niuna Guardia is better than a woman does to herself.
Do not accept reproaches or advice from those who educate did not know their children.
Don't wait for the fir to Pomi.
You don't have to do the most black devil than it is.
The boss must not be wrapped before breaking it.
We must not miss the favorable occasions, those who have time does not wait.
We must never use two weights and two measures.
We must not shake the barley from the sack before having the wheat.
There is no trouble without damage.
There is no so poor that it cannot help, nor so rich that you don't need help.
There is no meat in butchery that dog or cat does not take away.
There is no february-free carnival.
There is so bad thing that is not good to something.
There is no more sad about the land of the ungrateful man.
There is no two without three and the fourth comes from itself.
There's no two without three.
There is no erotic that does not have its belief.
There is no smoke without roast.
There is no hen or gallescary that in January the eggs do not face.
There is no hitch to have, more than ask and fear.
There is no bad without good.
There is no better blind than what you don't want to see.
There is no bread without penalty.
There is no worse deaf than those who do not want to hear.
There is no rule without exception.
There's no rose without thorns.
Fall leaf that God does not want.
There was never hasty he wasn't crazy.
There is no vineyard from harvesting, nor less no woman to marry.
Don't believe woman, even if she died.
Don't arouse the sleeping can.
Don't say cat if you don't have it in the bag.
Don't say four if you don't have it in the bag.
It's not my friend whatever saves her and eats mine.
It is not art to play, but stop it.
It's not nice what is beautiful, but it's nice what you like.
It is not good to be poet in the village.
It is not good to store money in a chest of which you don't have the key.
It is not by saying "Miel, Miel," that sweetness comes into my mouth.
It is not content whatever complains.
No one in any place who is in every place.
It is never great gagliardia, without a branch of madness.
It is not poor, if not who believes such.
It is not rich who owns but whoever needs.
It is not always Savio who does not know how to be crazy.
It is not a triste dog yes, which does not lead the tail.
It is not the one that reluces.
It's not a glittering.
This that reluces is not all gold.
There is no love without jealousy.
It doesn't make the same feeling the tickling to all people.
Doing nothing, more penalty you feel.
Never do well, you will never hurt.
Don't do to others what you wouldn't want to be done to you.
Don't hurt it's sin, don't do good that you wasted.
Don't take your leg longer than your leg.
It doesn't turn the crow who is not near the carrion.
Do not praise the beautiful day before evening.
Do not put the wagon in front of the oxen.
Don't put the razor in my hand.
Don't put a razor in my hand.
I never bish scorpion, I didn't medicate me with his oil.
Do not nam the rope in the house of hanged.
Not every abyss have a parapet.
Not every letter goes to the mail, not every question wants to answer.
Don't talk about the hanged house.
Don't think your heart what your mouth says.
He does not lose the brain if not those who have it.
You can't have full barrel and drunk wife.
You can't see the forest if you're among the trees.
Don't postpone what you can do today.
The clock bell with the sundial does not always agree.
It is not necessary to say "of such water I will not drink".
No science is needed to those who have no experience.
No air van.
It is not beginning well if not from the sky.
You don't smoke without fire.
You don't enter heaven in spite of the saints.
Nothing is done at all.
You don't have wedding with dried figs.
You never finish learning.
It is not taught to swim in fish.
You never read book without learning something.
It does not move leaf that God does not want.
The chestnut chestnuts can not be cavar from the cat's paw.
You can't have the full barrel and drunk wife.
You can't drink and whistle.
You never know why you work.
You are never so good that you can't feel better, nor so bad that you can't feel better.
All those who carry the rifle are not hunters.
They are not the same every day.
Do not tease the can sleep.
Don't make you poor to those who don't have rich.
Don't trust a stretch, grace or goodness.
Don't boast butterfly, your father was a caterpillar.
Not all donuts succeed with the hole.
Not all tears come from the heart.
Not all malals come to harm.
Not all crazy dishes break the dishes.
Not all crazy are at the asylum.
Not everyone we can live in the square.
Not everyone is sick those who are in bed.
Not everyone is unhappy as they believe.
Not everyone is infirm those who shout ahi!
Not everyone see the Serpe that is hidden under the grass.
Not all evil comes to harm.
There is never so much peace in the convent, like when the friars take the same tonaches.
Don't sell the skin of the bear before killed him.
There is no woman without love.
There is no deception that you don't win with deception.
There is no unrained linen, nor woman without a flaw.
There is nothing to be looking for cannot be penetrated.
There is no worse bar than true.
It was never cat that it did not correspond to mice.
I don't want to sleep nor guard.
Night, love and wine often make the petty man.
November Vinaio.
Nothing is so good that for a long time to go not to boredom.
New master, new law.
Feed the crow and you will take your eyes.
Nutri the SERPE in the breast, will make you poison.
O Taci, or 'better than silence.
Eye crying heart that Duole.
Eye that crying heart he feels.
Eye does not see, no duole heart.
Eye by eye, tooth tooth.
Today tomorrow to you.
Today, happy, melancholy tomorrow.
Today creditor, tomorrow debtor.
Today fresh and strong, tomorrow in death.
Today in the figure, tomorrow in burial.
Today at peace, tomorrow at war.
Today merchant, tomicating tomorrow.
Today rain and demand, everything changes at a time.
Each Abel has his Cain.
Each animal should not die down.
Every good game lasts little.
Every beautiful shoe becomes a ciabatta, every beautiful woman becomes grandmother.
Every good finally vanishes, but fame does not perish.
Every barrel gives the wine he has.
Each house has attic, cease, sewer and aquaio.
Every inequality, love equals.
Each grass is known from the seed.
Every effort deserves reward.
Every cat has its February.
Every day is not a party.
Every day you don't do wedding.
Every cricket believes horse.
Every left is lost.
Every wood has its tense.
Each firefly is not a fire.
Each snail sees the horns of others.
Each crazy does his act.
Each medal has its backhand.
Every crazy vuol give advice.
Each hair has its shadow.
Every people has the government that deserves.
Every promise is debt.
Each frog believes great lady.
Each frog believes a Diana.
Each monkey finds its monkeys beautiful.
Each Serpe has its poison.
Every similar loves its similar.
Every bird sings its verse.
Each bird makes its own verse.
Everyone suffers from his job.
Everyone for himself and God for everyone.
Ognun sees their geese as swans.
Everyone to his art and the wolf to the sheep.
Everyone loves feeling praised.
Everyone who has a great knife, is not a handle.
Everyone is a blacksmith of his fortune.
Everyone makes mistakes.
Everyone does his job.
Everyone has his tastes.
Everyone has his cross.
Everyone pulls water to his mill.
Lucerne oil every bad government.
Oil, vinegar, pepper and tasty fan salt also a boot.
Vegetable garden, dead man.
Barley and straw make the battle caval.
Rare guest host dear.
October Mostaio.
Country you go custom you find.
Pay the right for the sinner.
Hungry belly, desperate life.
Full belly does not believe fasting.
Empty belly does not feel reasons.
Bread until it lasts, wine with measure.
Relatives snakes, killer cousins, brothers knives.
Snake relatives.
Relatives, friends, rain, after three days come to boredom.
Opinion and not being is like spinning and not weave.
He speaks little, listen to a lot and never fail.
Talk to dauvera, because mother-in-law intends.
Speak French like a Spanish cow.
The festival passed, greeted the Holy.
After the river forgot the saint.
Clear agreements long friendship.
Child pacts, dear friends.
Clear agreements long friendship.
Crazy and buffoons have equal freedom.
Crazy is the one who bays to the facts of others.
Crazy by nature, Savio for writing.
Vecchi sins, new penance.
Sin concealed is half forgiven.
Sin confessed is half forgiven.
Sin confessed, half forgiven.
For love even the honest woman loses her head.
For love, even an honest woman can lose your head.
For those who want to be free, there is no chain that holds.
To be lovable, you have to love.
The bag is never missing to be alms.
For the wise the tears of women are like salted drops.
To learn something, it's never too late.
To trick a clever, it takes a smart and a half.
To teach you first learn.
For the abundance of the heart the mouth speaks.
For gold, the abbot sells the convent.
For the Santa Candelora of winter we are hole, but if it rains or pulls wind, we are inside.
For the Santa Candelora if he storms or if Gragnola of winter we are hole; But if it is sun or solicello we are only by winter.
By nature all men are similar; For education they become entirely different.
For each owl that you feel singing on the roof, you don't have to make mourning.
For how much everyone's beauty of a flower, nobody caught him if he smelled.
For San Lorenzo the walnut is made.
For San Lorenzo the walnut splits in the middle.
For San Lorenzo it rains from heaven burning coal.
For Santa Caterina Novembre, the beasts outside the farmhouse.
To find injustices you don't need lanterns.
For a nail we lose an iron, and for an iron a horse.
For a Martin point missed the hood.
For a broom they form a market three women and absordan all the neighborhood.
It loses tears who cries in front of the judge.
Forgive everyone, but not to you.
Forgive it is from men, forget it is from beasts.
Fish that goes to the hook, tries to be gramo.
Plant to which it often becomes a place, does not take vigor.
Small flame doesn't make great light.
Small reverschar stone can the wagon.
Small spark can burn the villa.
Small wheels carry great weights.
Small needle melts tight knot.
Stone that rolls does not make moss.
Piglia the good when it comes, and evil when it is convenient.
It always rains in the wet.
Pisa, weighs for those posing.
The higher the condition, the more humble one must be.
More briccone, more lucky.
The more the river is deep, the more silence flows.
More fish will catch who in the pond will not throw up but a network will buy.
The more you chat, less you love.
Rather a donkey that leads, that a horse that beats on the ground.
Little blinked life brigade.
Poet is born, speakers become.
Poets and holy campano all.
Poets, painters and pilgrims to do and say are guess.
Polenta and boiled milk, in four jumps is digested.
Bring frasconi to Vallombrosa.
Pulce cat and grumbling prayer do not arrive in heaven.
Humble prayer enters the sky.
Take the brunette for a lover and the blonde for wife.
Soon and well don't march together.
Provide to provide and prevent.
Prevention is better than cure.
Before death, don't call anyone happy.
Before wondering you need to be nest.
Before going to fishing it looks good at your network.
Before asking, think about the answer.
First to flatter and then scratch, it is art of cats.
Prodigal and wine bevitor, does neither oven or mill.
Apulian, one hundred for fork and one by country.
You can well straighten the tender virgult, not the tree already made adult.
Putto in wine and woman in Latin never did a good end.
What a proposal this answer.
Some intervals the madman of Saviozza, some interval the Savio has of foolishness.
Sometimes omero sleeper.
Which bird, such the nest.
Even even they transplanted into paradise, the cards would never take roses.
When in Tudi, when Grilli.
When the glory comes the memory vanishes.
When the soup arrives there is no longer left or right.
When the army is there, the general is also located.
When there is a health.
When he sings the frog, the rain is not far away.
When there are many roosters to sing you never do day.
When the passion is high, the reason is low.
When the dates crop is over, each finds to be paid to the palm.
When he whistles the ear straight, the heart is afflicted; When Manco, the heart is frank.
When the heretics catch up, the church has peace.
When Colombo has a full goiter, the vecces seem to love him.
When the CXXO is accustomed to the Peto you cannot keep it keto.
When the devil caresses you, he wants the soul.
When the child is SATOLO even honey has no taste.
When the child is seven years old, the reason for him.
When the cat licks the hair comes water down from the sky.
When the cat there is no mice dance.
When the cat cannot get to the lard says it is Rancido.
When the cat licks and rubs the ears with the paw, it will rain before it is morning.
When the goiter is full, the cherries are acerbs.
When the grain runs out, the farmer is reinforced.
When the wheat goes wrong, we need to thank God for straw.
When the lard is devoured, little Val hunt the cat.
When the almond is not fruit, the seed goes away.
When the limit master, the servo does not go straight.
When the little one speaks the great sparse.
When the sun shines, you don't care about the moon.
When time is clear in autumn, wind in winter.
When in autumn the rates and hares are fat, winter is rigorous.
When love is in pieces there is no glue that reombers it.
When the angel becomes the devil, there is no worse devil.
When her dies, the money breathes.
When Italy plays the guitar, Spain nacchere, France lute, Ireland Harp, Germany trumpet, England Violin, Holland Drum, nothing is equal to them.
When the beard makes biancher, leave the woman and at the wine.
When the cicada sings in September, don't buy great for sale.
When hungry comes from the door, love comes out of the window.
When the grace of God is in the heart, the eyes swim in the joy.
When the war begins the hell.
When the moon is white, weather is beautiful; If it is red, it means wind; If pale, rain.
When the ship sinks, the mice run away.
When the snow melts it turns out the mondle.
When the pear is mature you need to helmets.
When the pear is mature cafe by itself.
When the pear is mature, it falls alone.
When the root is cut, the leaves go.
When the reason sleeps, the heart escapes.
When the frog sings the time changes.
When he says nothing, different crazy is not from the Savio.
When you don't know, he attended to ask.
When it rains with the sun the devil makes love.
When it rains with the sun witches make love.
When it rains with the sun the old make love.
When it rains with the sun marry the fox.
When it rains in August, it rains honey and must.
When you are at theance you have to dance.
When you have suffered you are prone to compativi.
When you eat it is not spoken.
When they are engaged they have seven hands and a tongue, when they are married they have seven languages and a hand.
When too many roosters sing, you never do day.
When everything is of all, the times are ugly.
When a friend asks, there is no tomorrow.
When a poor gives the rich, God laughs in heaven.
When one thing happened, little is worth complaining.
When I believe it from the winter semo hole.
When force comes, the right is dead.
The more the mountain is higher, the deeper the valley.
The more frog swells, sooner crack.
The more he has, the more he would like it.
Four lights do not know.
Four new inventions boasts the world: scoring without knife, roasting without fire, washing without soap, and instead of glasses see through fingers.
What is innate by nature, goes to the burial.
What with water mixes and spoils the wine, deserves to drink the sea at the head of chino.
What is placed in heaven, it is worthwhile.
What is done is rendered.
What can not ìngegno can often luck.
What you can't pay with money, pay at least with Thanksgiving.
What is gown to the rich, steals to the poor.
What is done to good, never mind God.
What is done in the dark, appears in the sun.
What passes my intellect, I leave it.
That, which is done, is done, and you can't do, what was not.
That beauty wise man appreciates that always lasts, up to old age.
Those who have less ingenuity have to sell more than others.
The one that barks is the toothless dog.
What must last for eternity should not be written with water.
What happened yesterday, can happen today.
What has passed, is forgotten.
What it has to be, will be.
What does not happen today can take place tomorrow.
What has not been may be.
What the intellect cannot, can often the case.
What you can do today, don't postpone it tomorrow.
What is said to the echo in the woods, the forest repeats it.
What you learn in youth is never forgotten.
What uses does not apologize.
That's my uncle, who wants my good.
That is a reality child who knows his father.
This you must know that the jealousy of an Arab is the same jealousy.
Quiet not move.
Donkey broke never came to heaven.
Rago donkey does not rise to the sky.
Swamp frog always saves.
Frogs, unhealthy.
Render new benefits in others is the virtue of God and true big men.
Wealth poorly arranged to poverty suggested.
Wealth poorly arranged to poverty suggested.
Riches in India, know in Europe, and pump among the Ottomans.
Rich and poor do not bring a sheet to the other world.
Rich and great fortune can make you, but never the common sense can give you.
He laughs well who laughs the last one.
He laughs well who laughs last.
Respect the dog for the master.
Hot stuff the body does not weld.
Stuff of others, all screws.
Rome was not done in one day.
Rome Santa, Aquila Bella, Naples Galante.
Rome, to those who are nothing in a hundred years, to those who are very three days.
Red in the morning, near rain.
Red sky at night, good weather hopefully; Red morning near water.
Red sky at night, good weather hopefully.
Red evening, good time hopefully; Red in the morning ever approaching.
Red and yellow look looks beautiful at every face, green and turquoise you have to be more than bellino.
Bramble, in a good earth.
Empty bag is standing.
Skip who can.
San Benedetto La Rondine under the roof.
San Lorenzo da Gran Calura.
St. Peter embraced, Christ denied.
St. Silvestro December the olive in the basket.
Young blood always sparrow.
Sasso that rolls doesn't make moss.
Learning by doing errors.
It warms up the love that a thousand fires.
Scamped the danger, gabbato the saint.
He jokes with the Fanti and leave the saints.
Joking around the lumen that invites you, butterfly you will lose wings and life.
Hand joke, villa joke.
Mulo's back, boat course, good for those not.
Sorry not required, accusing manifest.
If you see the fat birds in February, wait a cold that breaks the stones.
If you are close to sixty, leave the women and choose the wine.
If you hurt, worse you are hit.
If you cook calmly, taste gains.
If you give a man a fish nuts for a day, if you teach him fishing for the rest of his days.
If they were good the grandchildren would not levernate from the vineyard.
If youth he knew, if old age could.
If you have the money you sit otherwise you're standing.
If you have a bear per friend, you will need to rescue.
If the cats knew flying, the peckings would be rare.
If the cultivator is no longer strong than the earth this ends up devouring it.
If the young man knew how old age needs, he often turned the bag.
If the thief left his steal, there would be no more forks.
If the family father is half, the servants are blind.
If the right foot is lame, God reinforces the left.
If the poet is as a speaker he will prey to ears and not to the heart.
If the first button you did be second, all wrong will be from top to bottom.
If the king spits over a fir is called real fir.
If the rich knew the hunger of the poor, he would give him his bread.
If thank you cost money, many if they would take it in your pocket.
If your cat is a thief, don't drive away from home.
If the virtuoso is poor, the praise is not enough; The first duty is to help him.
If the madness was pain, in every house he would feel stride.
If the lettuce warns to the geese, on the way back you will find a few.
Lovers are going and the pains remain.
If nobody knows what you know, nothing you need your knowledge.
If it is not soup it is wet pan.
If you have never stolen, the word thief is not for you.
If you don't help science, entrusted to Providence.
If you don't mind, Cuor doesn't sigh.
If everyone sweeps from his house, the whole city would be clear.
If it rained gold, people would get tired of collecting it.
If you are honest God will do the rest.
If they are roses they will flow, if they are spines they will stick.
If they're roses they'll bloom.
If a brother turns a murder, others are not responsible.
If you want the stuff to face, close your mouth and move your arms.
If you want me to t'ami, let you praise you.
If you want to bring the man to Incrinere, make him jealous.
If you want to feel good, eat little and sleep well.
Follow the thread and you will find the ball.
You will always scratch who who was born cat.
No blind is not singing.
No money is not sung.
Without humanity there is neither virtue, nor true courage, nor durable glory.
Without humility all virtues are vices.
Seren d'winter and summer nuvile, don't trust.
Seven in a shot! He said that tailor he had killed seven flies. Wellaism
September, the grapes are made and the fig pendant.
The child is kissed because of the mother, and the mother because of the child.
Those who want to contain its neighbors must be raised.
It is said sin, but not the sinner.
It is said sin, not the sinner.
It was first and then master.
It keeps an army for a thousand days, and does not use it for a moment.
We talk about the devil and the horns appear.
You can know your opinion from your yawning.
You can live without brothers but not without friends.
He was better when he was worse.
Both astrologer that guesses take you to ruin.
Safe like bread.
Sin that you live, it always becomes.
Sol people of the business, beasts and barrels, van out at night.
Fume soldier, good for another time.
They are master from the world today women and cedon toghe and swords with headphones and skirts.
They are better a hundred befs than damage.
The defects that the qualities we do not have are less ridiculous.
They are always the rags that go to the air.
They are always the rags that go by air.
It supports and do not blame what you can't change.
Above the fallen tree everyone runs to make wood.
Above the new shoes, sooner or later there is raining.
Above each wine, the Greek is divine.
Under the snow bread, under water hungry.
Often at a clear morning, there is a turbid evening.
Often those who commit an injustice, suffers a worse.
He often wins the humility than iron.
Wet bride lucky bride.
Narrow the leaf, the way wide, say yours that I said mine.
He tighten the shirt plus the skirt.
He studies not to know more, but to know more than others.
Study in youth, honor to old age.
On the skin of the Serpe nobody looks to the stains.
Poor suprabia also sorry to the devil; Rich humility also like God.
Do you go your neighbor? Put a zecchino.
Cim or sieve.
Cut your hair with the pot.
Cut them badly.
Tal leaves the roast that then craving smoke.
Like father Like Son.
Many roosters in Cantar never does day.
Many idols, so many temples.
So many make a very much.
So much smoke and little roasted.
Love how much fire must be stunized.
Love as much as the bean soup want a vent.
So the cat goes to the lard that leaves us the Zampino.
Such a cat goes to the lard that leaves us zampino.
Light and sweet time in New Year, ensures good weather all year.
Keep a liar in mind when you mind.
There's no harm in trying.
Land very much, land.
White land, tired tough.
Land cultivated hoped collection.
Black earth good grain mena.
Lizard's head, crane neck, spider legs, cow belly, slut rump.
Crazy head never affects.
Keep your mouth closed if you don't want to get the gold of mouth.
Tench of May and pike of September.
Tench in shirt, fur in fur.
He pulls more a woman's hair that hundred pairs of oxen.
He pulls more a fur of FXXA than a hundred pair of oxen.
Top the cause, ceased.
Round the lamb and leaves the porcello.
Torinesi and Monferrini, bread, wine and drums.
Dogs do not bodize.
Between two parties, the third gains.
Between saying and doing the sea is half.
Between the anvil and the hammer, hand does not put those who have brain.
Between wife and husband don't put your finger.
Between taking or leaving you need to think.
Betrayal likes very much, traditor never like.
Treating the poor man is the dishonor of the rich.
Three things hunt the man at home: smoke, drop and angry female.
Three things make sick man: love, wine and bathroom.
Three are the wonders, Naples, Rome and your face.
Thirty monks and abbot would not have a donkey to drink.
Sad and trouble, who believes too much and those who never believe.
Sad that dog lets you take your tail in your hand.
Sad that summer, who has Saggina and Rape.
CXXO trumpet, body health.
Too much manna, nausea.
Too much modesty is a masked pride.
Too many satisfactions take away every desire.
Too many cooks damn the kitchen.
Too poor and too rich it is equal disgrace.
Donkey trot lasts little.
You joke with your cat and caresse, but I know what I will have those Vezzi.
You are fox and I rate, you are smart but I'll spend you.
Turks and tartars, scourges of peoples.
The whole way does not fail the essay that, acting in half, corrects the journey.
All things are difficult before becoming easy.
All roads lead to Rome.
Every time he laughs a nail removes from the chest.
All of the crazy trunk we have a branch.
All rivers go to the sea.
Every day they are good to go hunting. But not to take birds.
All trouble are trouble, but the trouble without bread is the biggest.
All tastes are tastes.
All trades give bread.
All nodes come to the comb.
All deadly sins are females.
All the psalms end up in glory.
We are all sons of Adam and Eve.
All that lasts a long time.
Everything is good that ends well.
The whole brain is not in a head.
The whole world is a country.
All that is white is not flour.
Everything took place except for the neck bone.
Uccellin who puts a tail to eat at all times.
Caged bird does not sing for love, sings to anger.
Uci Uci, I hear Odor of Cristianucci.
Humility and courtesy adorn more than a woven robe.
A fir does not forest.
A nice game lasts little.
A nice tacer was never written.
A nice dress is a letter of recommendation.
A good abbot always praises its convent.
A good principle is always successful.
A bad book often has a good title, and an honest front, a brain ribaldo.
A knight between two ladies makes the figure of the salami.
A magnanimous heart always wants good, even if the prize never gets.
A general army is like a soul body.
A flower does not make garden.
A flower does not make spring.
One brother helps each other.
A grain of dust breaks the whole bomb burst.
A granule drops the scale.
A thief always doesn't steal, but you have to look at him.
A lumen is earlier than turned on.
An evil pulls the other.
An enemy is too much, one hundred friends are not enough.
A father camp one hundred children and a hundred children do not bell a father.
A crazy make one hundred.
A small hole makes a great ship sink.
A bit of wine The stomach settle, the too much ruin stomach and head.
A little for one doesn't hurt anyone.
A poor virtuous val more than a vicious rich.
A magnanima soul consults the others; A vulgar soul despises advice.
An ounce of joy worth more than a pound of sadness.
An hour of content discounted hundred years of torment.
A beautiful beard and a valent heart adorn the man.
A beautiful day doesn't do summer.
A beautiful tear easily finds a handkerchief that wipes it.
A lie needs seven lies.
A good laugh becomes all in good blood.
A cherry pulls the other.
One thing leads the other.
One and good.
A summer is worth more than ten winters.
One does, two yields, but to three we want to serve.
A phoenix among women is that, that other woman confesses to be beautiful.
A great fear no doctor care.
One but good.
A hand wash the other and both wash the face.
An apple a day levers the doctor.
One pays one hundred.
One pays all.
A walnut alone, does not sound in the bag.
A word pulls the other.
A plant that has many fruits do not mature everyone.
A swallow does not spring.
Once the dog runs and once the hare.
Once no one doesn't hurt anyone.
One seeds, the other collects.
Man on horseback, burial.
Forewarned is forearmed.
Forewarned is forearmed.
Man from nobody envied, is a non-lucky man.
Man of wine, it is not worth a full.
Dead man no longer makes war.
Man without money is a dead man walking.
Lonely man, or angel or demon.
Zealous man, man lover.
One hour egg, one-day bread, a year's wine, fifteen women and thirty years friends.
It goes with those who are better than you and pay the costs.
It goes more than a donkey to the market.
Go to the square you see and hate, come home drink and enjoy.
Val more a pleasure to make one hundred of those made.
Val more a lifetime that hundred in death.
The practice that grammar is worth more.
It is worth a fact that one hundred words.
It is worth a taste that a farmhouse.
It is more worth a vision witness than a hundred hearing.
It's more worth it.
Vanga and Zappa does not vuol fast.
Flat spade little attack, spade rich land, spade in rich double.
Old gifts want new thanks.
Old age patiently prolongs existence.
Old age eagle, youth of the ladoon.
See and not touch is a thing to die.
Seeing is believing.
Fresh crepe sea wind.
Full belly does not believe fasting.
Empty belly does not feel reasons.
Dress a wood, it seems a kingdom.
Dress a stake that looks nice.
There are crazy Savi, and the Savi crazy.
Near the church away from God.
Near the SERPE there is biacco.
Vineyard in stone and vegetable garden in Grasso terrer.
Winning an both in the lot is a curse, which increases hope to the vice.
Bitter wine, Tienilo dear.
Baptized wine is not worth a breath.
Baptized wine, it doesn't go to the palate.
Wine inside, hind.
Fiasco wine in the evening good and morning dead.
Wine and indignation fans Palese every design.
Wine is not good that I don't cheer up man.
Violence does not last long.
He lives well who takes the world as it comes.
Live and let live.
Vice of nature up to the dura pit. Vice of nature, until lasted death.
People's voice, voice of God.
Want to work jump on me, you work for me that I can't.
I want a rather a donkey who brings me, that a horse that jets me on earth.
Sleeping fox, Jew that swears, crying woman, Overfine malice hill fringes.
Zotics and Villani discuss with hands.
